Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-711. Finality of order or award — Review.

Award or Order of Administrative Law Judge or Single Commissioner — Review.

A compensation order or award of an administrative law judge or a single commissioner shall become final unless a party to the dispute shall, within thirty (30) days from the receipt by him or her of the order or award, petition in writing for a review by the full commission of the order or award.

Any other party to the dispute may cross appeal by filing a written petition for cross appeal within fifteen (15) days after the notice of appeal is filed in the office of the Workers' Compensation Commission, except that in no event shall a cross appellant have less than thirty (30) days from the receipt by him or her of the order or award within which to file a notice of cross appeal.

Award or Order of Commission — Appeal.

A compensation order or award of the commission shall become final unless a party to the dispute shall, within thirty (30) days from receipt by him or her of the order or award, file notice of appeal to the Court of Appeals, which is designated as the forum for judicial review of those orders and awards.

The appeal to the Court of Appeals may be taken by filing in the office of the commission, within thirty (30) days from the date of the receipt of the order or award of the commission, a notice of appeal, whereupon the commission under its certificate shall send to the Court of Appeals all pertinent documents and papers, together with a transcript of evidence and the findings and orders, which shall become the record of the cause.

Any other party to the dispute may cross appeal by filing in the office of the commission a notice of cross appeal to the Court of Appeals within fifteen (15) days after the notice of appeal is filed, except that in no event shall a cross appellant have less than thirty (30) days from his or her receipt of the order or award of the commission within which to file a notice of cross appeal.

The commission may assess and collect an appeal processing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) from the appellant and, if cross appealed, the cross appellant.

Appeals from the commission to the Court of Appeals shall be allowed as in other civil actions and shall take precedence over all other civil cases appealed to the Court of Appeals.

Upon appeal to the Court of Appeals, no additional evidence shall be heard.

In the absence of fraud, the findings of fact made by the commission within its power shall be conclusive and binding upon the Court of Appeals and shall be given the same force and effect as in cases heretofore decided by the Supreme Court, except subject to review as in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.

The Court of Appeals shall review only questions of law and may modify, reverse, remand for rehearing, or set aside the order or award, upon any of the following grounds, and no other:

That the commission acted without or in excess of its powers;

That the order or award was procured by fraud;

That the facts found by the commission do not support the order or award; or

That the order or award was not supported by substantial evidence of record.

Appeal Costs.

In all appeals the cost shall be assessed as provided by law in civil cases.

The commission may require a bond from either party, if it deems necessary, in cases appealed to the Court of Appeals.

School District Employees. The action taken by the commission with respect to the allowance or disallowance of any claim filed by a school district employee shall be subject to appeal to the Court of Appeals as provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 25, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1967, No. 501, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 15; 1979, No. 252, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 7; 1979, No. 597, § 4; 1981, No. 290, § 14; 1981, No. 631, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1325, 81-1325.1; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 15; Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 7; 2003, No. 1473, § 24.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 15. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Court of Appeals held, in a Per Curiam opinion issued on March 28, 1990, that subsection (b) of this section was not superseded by ARAP 4.

11-9-712. Enforcement of order or award.

If any employer fails to comply with a final compensation order or award, any beneficiary of the order or award, or the Workers' Compensation Commission, may file a certified copy of the order or award in the office of the circuit clerk of any county in this state where any property of the employer may be found. At that time, the circuit clerk shall enter the order or award in the judgment record of the county, and the order or award so recorded shall be a judgment and lien as are judgments of the circuit court, and enforceable as such.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 25, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1325.

Partnerships.

An award of the Workers' Compensation Commission entered against a partnership in its firm name only and which makes no reference to the individual copartners may not be enforced as a judgment by garnishment or execution against a copartner. Pate v. Martin, 13 Ark. App. 182, 681 S.W.2d 410 (1985).

11-9-713. Modification of awards.

Except where a joint petition settlement has been approved, the Workers' Compensation Commission may review any compensation order, award, or decision.

This may be done at any time within six (6) months of termination of the compensation period fixed in the original compensation order or award, upon the commission's own motion or upon the application of any party in interest, on the ground of a change in physical condition or upon proof of erroneous wage rate.

Upon the review, the commission may make an order or award terminating, continuing, decreasing, or increasing for the future the compensation previously awarded, subject to the maximum limits provided for in this chapter.

The review and subsequent order or award shall be made in accordance with the procedure prescribed in § 11-9-704.

No review shall affect any compensation paid pursuant to a prior order or award.

The commission may, at any time, correct any clerical error in any compensation order or award.

Aging and the effects of aging on a compensable injury are not to be considered in determining whether there has been a change in physical condition. Nor shall aging or the effect of aging on a compensable injury be considered in determining permanent disability pursuant to this section or any other section in this chapter. The purpose and intent of this section is to annul any and all case law inconsistent herewith, including International Paper Co. v. Tuberville, 302 Ark. 22, 786 S.W.2d 830 (1990).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 26, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1326; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 31.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-714. Costs in proceedings brought without reasonable grounds.

If the court having jurisdiction of proceedings in respect of any claim or compensation order determines that the proceedings in respect to the claim or order have been instituted or continued without reasonable grounds, the cost of the proceedings shall be assessed against the party who has instituted or continued the proceedings.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 30, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1330.

Cross References.

Frivolous actions, state required to pay costs and fees for bringing, § 16-68-508.

11-9-715. Fees for legal services.

Fees for legal services rendered in respect of a claim shall not be valid unless approved by the Workers' Compensation Commission.

Attorney's fees shall be twenty-five percent (25%) of compensation for indemnity benefits payable to the injured employee or dependents of a deceased employee. Attorney's fees shall not be awarded on medical benefits or services except as provided in subdivision (a)(4) of this section.

Whenever the commission finds that a claim against the Treasurer of State, as custodian of the Second Injury Trust Fund or as custodian of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, has been controverted, in whole or in part, the commission shall direct that fees for legal services be paid from the fund, in addition to compensation awarded, and the fees shall be allowed only on the amount of compensation controverted and awarded from the fund.

In all other cases whenever the commission finds that a claim has been controverted, in whole or in part, the commission shall direct that fees for legal services be paid to the attorney for the claimant as follows: One-half (½) by the employer or carrier in addition to compensation awarded; and one-half (½) by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased employee out of compensation payable to them.

The fees shall be allowed only on the amount of compensation for indemnity benefits controverted and awarded.

However, the commission shall not find that a claim has been controverted if the claimant or his or her representative has withheld from the respondent during the period of time allotted for the respondent to determine its position any medical information in his or her possession which substantiates the claim.

Whenever the commission finds that a claim has not been controverted but further finds that bona fide legal services have been rendered in respect to the claim, then the commission shall direct the payment of the fees by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased employee out of the compensation awarded.

In determining the amount of fees when a claim is not controverted, the commission shall use its discretion in awarding an attorney's fee not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) and in so doing shall take into consideration the nature, length, and complexity of the services performed and the benefits resulting to the compensation beneficiaries.

In any case where attorney's fees are allowed by the commission, the limitations expressed in the first sentence herein shall apply.

Medical providers may voluntarily contract with the attorney for the claimant to recover disputed bills, and the attorney may charge a reasonable fee to the medical provider as a cost of collection.

If the claimant prevails on appeal, the attorney for the claimant shall be entitled to an additional fee at the full commission and appellate court levels in addition to the fees provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the additional fee to be paid equally by the employer or carrier and by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased employee, as provided above and set by the commission or appellate court.

The maximum fees allowable pursuant to this subsection shall be the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) on appeals to the full commission from a decision of the administrative law judge and the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) on appeals to the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court from a decision of the commission.

In determining the amount of fees, the commission and the court shall take into consideration the nature, length, and complexity of the services performed and the benefits resulting to the compensation beneficiary.

The fee for legal services rendered by the claimant's attorney in connection with a change of physician requested by the injured employee, controverted by the employer or carrier and awarded by the commission, shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

No additional fee shall be payable with respect to uncontroverted charges incurred in connection with treatment by the new physician.

No fees for legal services rendered by the claimant's attorney with respect to the preliminary conference procedure shall be awarded by the commission.

However, the claimant's attorney or other representative may charge a reasonable fee to the claimant for representation in connection with the conference.

Unless compensability of a claim is controverted by the employer or carrier, fees for legal services by the claimant's attorney with respect to disability for loss of wage-earning capacity shall be payable only for amounts awarded at a contested hearing which exceed the amount, if any, which the employer or carrier agreed in writing to accept at the preliminary conference.

The amendments made by this act of 2001 regarding attorney's fees contained in this section shall be effective with respect to benefits payable in connection with disability or death due to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2001.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 32, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 144, § 2; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 16; 1979, No. 253, § 8; 1979, No. 822, § 1; 1981, No. 290, § 12; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1332; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 16; Acts 2001, No. 1281, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 16. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Subsection (e) (formerly (f)) is printed as enacted. Former subsection (f) may still be effective as to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1986 and before July 1, 2001. It read, “(f) The amendments regarding attorney's fees contained in this section shall be effective with respect to benefits payable in connection with disability or death due to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1986.”

Publisher's Notes.

The Per Curiam Order of the Supreme Court of Arkansas, dated September 1, 1993, provided, in part, that subdivision (b)(1) of this section provides for additional attorney's fees if the claimant prevails on appeal, but this section neither expressly provides for nor expressly prohibits an additional award of attorney's fees in cases where the claimant has been required to defend his award of workers' compensation benefits through two separate appeals brought by the employer to the Supreme Court. Construing the attorney's fee provision liberally and in accordance with the remedial purposes of § 11-9-704(c)(3), the Supreme Court held that an additional award of attorney's fees is authorized by the statute under such circumstances.

11-9-716. Lump-sum attorney's fees.

The Workers' Compensation Commission is authorized to approve lump-sum attorney's fees for legal services rendered in respect of a claim before the commission.

The lump-sum attorney's fees are allowable notwithstanding that the award of compensation to the injured employee is to be paid on an installment basis.

Lump-sum attorney's fees, if approved by the commission, shall be discounted at the rate provided in § 11-9-804, as that provision may be amended from time to time.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 215, § 1; 1981, No. 631, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1332.1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 11-9-701 — 11-9-715 may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

11-9-717. Attorney's signature.

Every claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, and other paper of a party represented by an attorney shall be signed by at least one (1) attorney of record in his or her individual name, whose address shall be stated.

A party who is not represented by an attorney shall sign his or her claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, or other paper, and state his or her address.

The signature of an attorney or party constitutes a certificate by him or her that:

He or she has read the claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, or other paper;

To the best of his or her knowledge, information, and belief formed after reasonable inquiry, it is well grounded in fact and is warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of existing law; and

It is not interposed for any improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation.

If a claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, or other paper is not signed, it shall be stricken unless it is signed promptly after the omission is called to the attention of the pleader or movant.

If a claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, or other paper is signed in violation of this rule, the Workers' Compensation Commission, including administrative law judges, upon motion or upon their own initiative, shall impose upon the person who signed it, a represented party, or both, an appropriate sanction, which may include an order to pay to the other party or parties the amount of reasonable expenses incurred because of the filing of a claim, request for benefits, request for additional benefits, controversion of benefits, request for a hearing, pleading, motion, or other paper, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

Appropriate sanctions, including the amount of reasonable expenses and attorney's fees, may also be imposed against a party or its attorney which, without good cause shown, fails to appear for a hearing, deposition, or any other matter scheduled by the commission or administrative law judge, or frivolously joins another party.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 36.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 11-9-701 — 11-9-715 may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 8
— Payment

Effective Dates.

Acts 1959, No. 167, § 2: approved Mar. 4, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that claimants in workmen's compensation cases are being denied interests on workmen's compensation awards and that such denial is contrary to the public interest. This act being necessary for the preservation of the public health, peace and happiness for the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1979, No. 253, § 12: Mar. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Worker's Compensation law are in urgent need of revision to more clearly define the benefits to be provided by Worker's Compensation coverage; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 290, § 17: Mar. 3, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the provisions of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation law and to provide improved benefits for persons qualifying under that Act; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and improved benefits and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15: July 1, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased benefits and improvements in the administration of the Workers' Compensation system in Arkansas is in the best interest of employees, employers, the public in general; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-9-801. Methods of payment.

Compensation shall be paid by check, by electronic funds transfer, or by state warrant.

Payment shall be made payable to the order of the person entitled to the compensation and paid directly to the person entitled to the compensation.

If the compensation beneficiary is a mental incompetent or a minor of tender years or immature judgment, the Workers' Compensation Commission, in the exercise of its discretion, may direct that payment shall be made to a legally appointed guardian of the estate of the incompetent or minor.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 6; 1981, No. 290, §§ 7-9; 1983, No. 720, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319; Acts 2009, No. 726, § 3.

11-9-802. Installments.

The first installment of compensation shall become due on the fifteenth day after the employer has notice of the injury or death, as provided in § 11-9-701, on which date all compensation then accrued shall be paid. Thereafter, compensation shall be paid every two (2) weeks except where the Workers' Compensation Commission directs that installment payments be made at other periods.

If any installment of compensation payable without an award is not paid within fifteen (15) days after it becomes due, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, there shall be added to the unpaid installment an amount equal to eighteen percent (18%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, the installment unless notice of controversion is filed or an extension is granted the employer under § 11-9-803 or unless such nonpayment is excused by the commission after a showing by the employer that, owing to conditions over which he or she had no control, the installment could not be paid within the period prescribed.

If any installment payable under the terms of an award is not paid within fifteen (15) days after it becomes due, there shall be added to such unpaid installment an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, the installment unless review of the compensation order making the award is had as provided in §§ 11-9-711 and 11-9-712.

Medical bills are payable within thirty (30) days after receipt by the respondent unless disputed as to compensability or amount.

In the event that the commission finds the failure to pay any benefit is willful and intentional, the penalty shall be up to thirty-six percent (36%), payable to the claimant.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; 1981, No. 290, § 8; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 37.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-803. Controversion of right to compensation.

Each employer desiring to controvert the right to compensation shall file with the Workers' Compensation Commission on or before the fifteenth day following notice of the alleged injury or death a statement on a form prescribed by the commission that the right to compensation is controverted and the grounds therefor, the names of the claimant, employer, and carrier, if any, and the date and place of the alleged injury or death.

Failure to file the statement of controversion shall not preclude the urging of any defense to the claim subsequently filed, nor shall the filing of a statement of controversion preclude the urging of additional defenses to those contained in the statement of controversion.

If an employer is unable to obtain sufficient medical information as to the alleged injury or death within fifteen (15) days following receipt of notice, although the employer has acted in good faith and with all due diligence, the employer may apply in writing for an extension of time for making payment of the first installment or controverting the claim.

This written application is to be postmarked within the fifteen-day period.

The commission may, in its discretion, grant the extension and fix the additional time to be allowed.

Filing of application for an extension shall not be deemed to be a controversion of the claim.

The provision in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply in cases where the physician is an employee of, on retainer with, or has a written contract to provide medical services for the employer.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; 1981, No. 290, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-804. Lump-sum settlement.

Whenever the Workers' Compensation Commission determines that it is for the best interest of the parties entitled to compensation, and after due notice to all parties in interest of a hearing, the liability of the employer for compensation may be discharged by the payment of a lump sum equal to the present value of all future payments of compensation computed at ten percent (10%) discount, compounded annually.

Lump-sum settlements shall not be allowed if the employer presents evidence which proves by a preponderance of the evidence that ordering the compensation discharged in such a manner would result in a substantial adverse effect on the continuing economic viability of the employer.

The probability of the death of the injured employee or other persons entitled to compensation before the expiration of the period during which they are entitled to compensation shall, in the absence of special circumstances making such a course improper, be determined in accordance with the following table.

It is intended that this table shall be used in conjunction with the discount rate prescribed in subsection (a)(1) of this section for the purpose of calculating the present value of lump-sum settlements to injured employees.

The probability of the happening of any other contingency affecting the amount or duration of compensation shall be disregarded, except the possibility of the remarriage of the widow, which shall be determined in accordance with the Danish Annuity and Dutch Remarriage Table.

Age
Years Average Remaining Lifetime Years 1 74.97 2 75.37 3 74.47 4 73.54 5 72.59 6 71.63 7 70.67 8 69.70 9 68.73 10 67.75 11 66.77 12 65.80 13 64.82 14 63.84 15 62.87 16 61.90 17 60.94 18 59.97 19 59.02 20 58.06 21 57.10 22 56.15 23 55.19 24 54.24 25 53.29 26 52.33 27 51.38 28 50.42 29 49.47 30 48.52 31 47.57 32 46.62 33 45.68 34 44.73 35 43.79 36 42.86 37 41.92 38 40.66 39 40.07 40 39.14 41 38.23 42 37.31 43 36.41 44 35.50 45 34.60 46 33.71 47 32.83 48 31.95 49 31.08 50 30.21 51 29.35 52 28.49 53 27.65 54 26.80 55 25.97 56 25.14 57 24.31 58 23.49 59 22.68 60 21.88 61 21.09 62 20.30 63 19.53 64 18.76 65 18.00 66 17.25 67 16.51 68 15.78 69 15.06 70 14.35 71 13.67 72 13.01 73 12.38 74 11.77 75 11.18 76 10.61 77 10.04 78 9.48 79 8.93 80 8.40 81 7.90 82 7.42 83 6.98 84 6.57 85 6.17 86 5.80 87 5.43 88 5.09 89 4.77 90 4.47 91 4.18 92 3.92 93 3.69 94 3.50 95 3.33 96 3.18 97 3.06 98 2.95 99 2.85 100 2.77

Click to view table.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 6; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319; Acts 1989, No. 460, § 1.

11-9-805. Joint petition for final settlement.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, upon petition filed by the employer or carrier and the injured employee requesting that a final settlement be had between the parties, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall hear the petition and take testimony and make investigations as may be necessary to determine whether a final settlement should be had.

If a claimant has been determined to be eligible for Medicare, the parties may petition the commission for a partial settlement of all issues other than future medical treatment.

A partial settlement under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section is final concerning all issues except future medical treatment.

If the commission decides that a final settlement award is in the best interests of the parties, the commission may order an award that is final concerning the rights of all the parties to the joint petition.

After the commission enters an order with regard to any full settlement, the commission does not have jurisdiction over any claim for the same injury or any results arising from it.

If the commission decides that a partial settlement award is in the best interests of the parties, the commission may order an award that is final concerning the partial settlement of the rights of all the parties to the joint petition.

After the commission enters an order with regard to any partial settlement, the commission does not have jurisdiction over any claim for the same injury or any results arising from it other than claims for future medical expenses.

If an employee has returned to work or agreed to return to work, the commission shall not approve a joint petition which has allotted moneys for vocational rehabilitation or any indemnity benefits in excess of that payable as an anatomical impairment as established by objective and measurable findings.

If the commission denies the petition, the denial shall be without prejudice to either party.

An appeal shall not lie from an order or award denying or approving a joint petition.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 33; 2017, No. 1058, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); added “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); redesignated former (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A); rewrote (b)(1)(A); added (b)(1)(B); rewrote (b)(2); and, in (e), substituted “An appeal shall not” for “No appeal shall” and inserted “or approving”.

11-9-806. Disputed source of benefits.

In any case where an employer changes insurance carriers or where the employer having been self-insured, becomes insured or, having been insured, is approved to be self-insured, and the only dispute in a claim against that employer is the proper source of payment of benefits, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall direct that the appropriate compensation benefits be paid on an equal basis by the carriers or self-insured employer.

Upon eventual resolution of the issue, the prevailing respondent shall be entitled to reimbursement from the other respondent of all moneys paid together with interest at the legal rate from the date of payment.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-807. Credit for compensation or wages paid.

If the employer has made advance payments for compensation, the employer shall be entitled to be reimbursed out of any unpaid installment or installments of compensation due.

If the injured employee receives full wages during disability, he or she shall not be entitled to compensation during the period.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-808. Deposit or bond to secure payment.

The Workers' Compensation Commission may require any employer to make a deposit or bond with the commission to secure the prompt and convenient payment of compensation, and payments shall be made upon order of the commission.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-809. Interest.

Compensation shall bear interest at the legal rate from the day an award is made by either an administrative law judge or the full Workers' Compensation Commission on all accrued and unpaid compensation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-810. Notice of payment.

Upon making the first payment and upon suspension of payment of compensation, the employer shall notify the Workers' Compensation Commission of that fact on a form prescribed by the commission.

Within thirty (30) days after the final payment of compensation has been made, the employer shall send to the commission a notice, in accordance with a form prescribed by the commission. This form shall state that the final payment has been made, the total amount of compensation paid, the name of the employee and of any other person to whom compensation has been paid, the date of the injury or death, and the person to whom compensation has been paid.

If the employer fails so to notify the commission within that time, the commission may assess against the employer a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), but no penalty shall be assessed without notice to the employer, giving the employer an opportunity to be heard.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1959, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-811. Investigations.

Upon its own initiative at any time where compensation payments are being made without an award, the Workers' Compensation Commission may and in any case where the right to compensation has been controverted or where payments of compensation have been suspended, or where an employer seeks to suspend payments made under an award, or on application of an interested party, the commission shall make such investigation, cause such medical examination to be made, hold such hearings, and take such further action as the commission deems proper for the protection of the rights of all parties.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 19, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1953, No. 167, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1319.

11-9-812. Incarceration of injured employee.

When any person who receives workers' compensation benefits is incarcerated in an institution under the control of the Division of Correction, the inmate's spouse or, if no spouse, the inmate's minor dependent children, may petition the Workers' Compensation Commission to award to the spouse or minor dependent children the inmate's workers' compensation weekly disability benefits for the period of the claimant's incarceration.

If the inmate has no surviving spouse or surviving minor dependent children, the division may petition the commission to award to the division the amount of the workers' compensation weekly disability benefits for the period of the claimant's incarceration necessary to reimburse the division for the cost of incarcerating the inmate.

The commission shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 372, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 798; 2019, No. 910, § 697.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1).